Missouri, session 2026, HB2993.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 313, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 313.302, to read as follows:
313.302. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Computer gaming system", the system consisting of draw games terminals
and related equipment that communicates with the central processing equipment and a
communication network;
(2) "Draw games", a game played on a draw games terminal that is in
communication with the lottery's computer gaming system;
(3) "Draw games lottery retailer", a licensed retailer who has contracted with
the lottery to sell draw games;
(4) "Draw games terminal", computer hardware through which a player's game
selections are generated and claims may be validated;
(5) "Draw games ticket", a computer issued game play by a draw games lottery
retailer to a player as a record for the numbers or wagers or combination of numbers or
wagers the player has selected;
(6) "Scratchers game", the Missouri lottery game in which a preprinted
scratchers ticket is purchased, and upon removal of a scratch-off coating on the ticket,
the ticket bearer determines his or her winnings, if any;
(7) "Scratchers ticket", a Missouri lottery scratchers game ticket.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2993 2
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, all draw games and scratchers games shall
provide in a conspicuous place on the face of the delivered draw games ticket or
scratchers ticket a date upon which the game expires.
✔